src-fst-morphology-affixes-propernouns.lexc.md
Proper noun inflection
The LIVVI-KARELIAN language proper nouns inflect in the same cases as regular
nouns, but sometimes with a colon (':') as separator.

LEXICON PROP_ 

### ONE-SYLLABLE LEMMA AND STEM
LEXICON PROP_VYÖ vyö:vyö

LEXICON PROP_MUA mua:maa

### TWO-SYLLABLE LEMMA AND STEM
LEXICON PROP_OZA
Gradation NA
Back vowel
Stem  vowel a
Plural stem in i

LEXICON PROP_OZA_FEM

LEXICON PROP-PLC_OZA

LEXICON PROP_KALA 
Gradation NA
Back vowel
Stem  vowel a
Plural stem in oi

LEXICON PROP_KALA_PATRFEM 

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KALA 

LEXICON PROP_KALA_SURFEM 

LEXICON PROP_PAPPI 
Gradation Yes
Back vowel
Stem	 vowel i
Plural stem in iloi

LEXICON PROP_PAPPI-SG 

LEXICON PROP_PAPPI-PL 

LEXICON PROP-PLC_PAPPI 

LEXICON PROP_ARTELI
Gradation NA
Back vowel
Stem  vowel i
Plural stem in iloi

LEXICON PROP_ARTELI-SG

LEXICON PROP_ARTELI-PL

LEXICON PROP_LEIRI
Gradation NA
Front vowel
Stem  vowel i
Plural stem in iloi

LEXICON PROP_LEIRI-SG

LEXICON PROP_LEIRI-PL

LEXICON PROP_NIMI nimi:nim
Gradation NA
Front vowel
Stem	 vowel i/e
Plural stem in i

LEXICON PROP_JÄLGI 
Gradation Yes
Vowel Harmony Front
Stem Vowel i/0/e
Plural stem in i

LEXICON PROP_JÄLGI-SG 

LEXICON PROP_JÄLGI-PL 

LEXICON PROP_JOGI 
Gradation Yes
Vowel Harmony Back
Stem Vowel i/0/e
Plural stem in i

LEXICON PROP_JOGI-SG 

LEXICON PROP_JOGI-PL 

LEXICON PROP_SUARI suari:suar
Gradation NA
Vowel Harmony Back
Stem Vowel i/0/e
Plural stem in i

LEXICON PROP_REBOI reboi:reboi
Gradation NA
Vowel Harmony Back
Stem Vowel oi/o
Plural stem in oloi

LEXICON PROP_KOIRU koiru:koira
Gradation NA
Back vowel
Stem	 vowel u/a
Plural stem in i

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KOIRU koiru:koira

LEXICON PROP_PÄIVY päivy:päivä
Gradation NA
Vowel Harmony Front
Stem Vowel y/ä
Plural stem in i

LEXICON PROP-PLC_KNIIGU kniigu:kniiga
Gradation No (looks like it should have gradation)
Vowel Harmony Back
Stem Vowel u/a
Plural stem in oi

LEXICON PROP_MUARJU muarju:muarja
Gradation NA
Vowel Harmony Back
Stem Vowel u:a
Plural stem in o

LEXICON PROP-PLC_MUARJU muarju:muarja

LEXICON PROP_AKKU akku:akka
Gradation Yes
Vowel Harmony Back
Stem Vowel u:a
Plural stem in o

LEXICON PROP_KOIVU koivu:koivu
Back vowel
Gradation NA
Stem vowel u
Plural stem in loi
Can be merged with _RUNO

LEXICON PROP_RUNO runo:runo
Back	vowel
Gradation NA
Stem vowel o
Plural stem in loi

LEXICON PROP_RUADO ruado:ruado
Back vowel
Gradation Yes
Stem vowel o
Plural stem in loi

LEXICON PROP-PLC_RUADO ruado:ruado

LEXICON PROP_KYNDÖ kyndö:kyndö
Front vowel
Gradation Yes
Stem vowel o
Plural stem in loi

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI 
Back	vowel
Gradation NA

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI-SG 

LEXICON PROP_VALGEI-PL 

### TWO-SYLLABLE LEMMA THREE-SYLLABLE STEM

LEXICON PROP_KARJAL karjal:karjal
Back vowel
Gradation NA
Singular stem vowel 0/a
Plural stem vowel o

LEXICON PROP-MAL_KARJAL 

LEXICON PROP_KARJALAINE karjalaine:karjala

LEXICON PROP_KIELINE kieline:kieli

**LEXICON PROP-PLC_TVER** Tver:Tver

**LEXICON PROP-PLC_TAIGIN**

**LEXICON PROP_PEREH** pereh:pereh

**LEXICON PROP_VIDEL** videl:videl

* LEXICON PROP_VIDEL Pavlovič:Pavlov

LEXICON PROP-PLC_ALUS Alus:Aluks

LEXICON PROP_ALUS Alus:Aluks

LEXICON PROP_KONDII kondii:kondi

LEXICON PROP_STIPENDII kondii:kondi

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc)</small>

---
